North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 35. Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government.

§ 120-305.
Creation and membership of Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government.

The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government is established. The Committee consists of 12 members as follows:

Six members of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate. At least three of the members shall be members of the Senate appropriations committee that has jurisdiction over the agencies set out in G.S. 120-306(a)(1).

Six members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives. At least three of the members shall be members of the House of Representatives appropriations subcommittee that has jurisdiction over the agencies set out in G.S. 120-306(a)(1).

Terms on the Committee are for two years and begin on the convening of the General Assembly in each odd-numbered year. Members may complete a term of service on the Committee even if they do not seek reelection or are not reelected to the General Assembly, but resignation or removal from service in the General Assembly constitutes resignation or removal from service on the Committee.

A member continues to serve until a successor is appointed. A vacancy shall be filled within 30 days by the officer who made the original appointment.

History.

2014-100, s. 22.1.

§ 120-306.
Purpose and powers of Committee.

The Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government shall examine on a continuing basis the services provided by the departments and agencies set out in this subsection in order to make ongoing recommendations to the General Assembly on ways to improve the effectiveness, efficiency, and quality of State government services. The Committee has the following powers and duties:

Study the programs, organization, operations, and policies of the following agencies:

Department of Administration.

Department of State Auditor.

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(tt), effective July 1, 2015.

Governor’s Office.

Housing Finance Agency.

Department of Insurance.

Lieutenant Governor’s Office.

Office of Administrative Hearings.

Office of State Human Resources.

Department of Revenue.

Department of Secretary of State.

State Board of Elections.

Office of State Budget and Management.

Office of State Controller.

State Ethics Commission.

Department of State Treasurer.

General Assembly.

Any other agency under the jurisdiction of the Senate and House of Representatives appropriations subcommittees on general government.

Review compliance of budget actions directed by the General Assembly.

Monitor expenditures, deviations, and changes made by the agencies set out in subdivision (a)(1) of this section to the certified budget.

Review policy changes as directed by law.

Receive presentations of reports from agencies directed in the law, including audits, studies, and other reports.

Review any issues that arise during the interim period between sessions of the General Assembly and provide a venue for any of these issues to be heard in a public setting.

Monitor the quality of services provided by general government agencies to other agencies and the public.

Identify opportunities for general government agencies to coordinate and collaborate to eliminate duplicative functions.

Have presentations and reports on any other matters that the Committee considers necessary to fulfill its mandate.

The Committee may make reports to the General Assembly. A report to the General Assembly may contain legislation needed to implement a recommendation of the Committee.

History.

2014-100, s. 22.1; 2015-241, s. 14.30(tt); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor substituted “Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement” for “State Board of Elections” in subsection (a)(1)
l
. and set out subsection (a)(1)o., which formerly read “State Ethics Commission”, as repealed.

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b) and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to the references in this section.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(tt), effective July 1, 2015, repealed subdivision (a)(1)c.

§ 120-307.
Organization of Committee.

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each designate a cochair of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government. The Committee shall meet upon the joint call of the cochairs.

A quorum of the Committee is five members. No action may be taken except by a majority vote at a meeting at which a quorum is present. While in the discharge of its official duties, the Committee has the powers of a joint committee under

G.S. 120-19

and

G.S. 120-19

.1 through

G.S. 120-19.4

.

Members of the Committee shall receive subsistence and travel expenses as provided in

G.S. 120-3.1

. The Committee may contract for consultants or hire employees in accordance with

G.S. 120-32.02

. The Legislative Services Commission, through the Legislative Services Officer, shall assign professional staff to assist the Committee in its work. Upon the direction of the Legislative Services Commission, the Directors of Legislative Assistants of the Senate and of the House of Representatives shall assign clerical staff to the Committee. The expenses for clerical employees shall be borne by the Committee.

The Committee cochairs may establish subcommittees for the purpose of examining issues relating to services provided by particular divisions within the State’s general government departments.

History.

2014-100, s. 22.1.

§ 120-308.
Reports to Committee.

Whenever a department, office, or agency set out in subdivision (a)(1) of

G.S. 120-306

is required by law to report to the General Assembly or to any of its permanent committees or subcommittees on matters affecting the services the department or agency provides, the department or agency shall transmit a copy of the report to the cochairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government.

History.

2014-100, s. 22.1.